Hawaii statutes.
B. Board of
Education

Revision Note

Sections 302A-121 to 302A-127 designated as subpart B pursuant
to §23G-15.

[§302A-121] Board of education; members;
student and military representatives. (a) The board shall consist of nine
members as follows:

(1) One member from the county of Hawaii;

(2) One member from the county of Maui;

(3) One member from the county of Kauai;

(4) Three members from the city and county of
Honolulu; and

(5) Three at-large members; provided that the
governor shall select an at-large member as the chairperson.

The members shall be appointed by the governor, with
the advice and consent of the senate. The governor may remove or suspend for cause any member of the board.

(b) Pursuant to article XVIII, section 12, of
the Hawaii State Constitution, the period of transition from the elected to the
appointed board shall be as determined in section 21 of Act 5, Session Laws of
Hawaii 2011.

(c) The members of the board shall serve
without pay but shall be entitled to reimbursement
for necessary expenses, including travel and board and lodging expenses, while attending meetings of the board or when
actually engaged in business relating to the work of the board.

(d) Pursuant to section 302A-447, the state
student council shall select a nonvoting public high school student
representative to the board.

(e) Pursuant to section 302A-1101(c), the
board shall invite the senior military commander in Hawaii to appoint a
nonvoting military representative to the board. [L 2011, c 5, pt of §2]

Revision Note

In section heading, "representative" changed to
"representatives".

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next